Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.560

Nursing homes and hospice programs—Emergency drug kits—Supplemental dose kits.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) A pharmacy or pharmacist may provide a limited quantity of drugs to a nursing home or hospice program without a prescription for emergency administration by authorized personnel of the facility or program pursuant to a valid prescription. The drugs so provided must be limited to those required to meet the immediate therapeutic needs of residents or patients and may not be available from another authorized source in sufficient time to prevent risk of harm by delay resulting from obtaining drugs from another source. Emergency kits must be secured in a locked room, container, or device to prevent unauthorized access and to ensure the proper environment for preservation of the drugs.

(2) In addition to or in connection with the emergency kit authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a nursing home that employs a unit dose drug distribution system may maintain a supplemental dose kit for supplemental nonemergency drug therapy. Supplemental dose kits must be secured in a locked room, container, or device to prevent unauthorized access, and to ensure the proper environment for preservation of the drugs. Administration of drugs from a supplemental dose kit must be under a valid prescription or chart order.

(3) The types and quantity of drugs appropriate to serve the resident or patient population of a nursing home or hospice program using an emergency kit or supplemental dose kit and procedures for the proper storage and security of drugs must be determined by a pharmaceutical services committee that includes a pharmacist licensed under this chapter, a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, or an *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, and appropriate clinical or administrative personnel of the nursing home or hospice program as set forth in rules adopted by the pharmacy quality assurance commission.

(4) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse operating under appropriate direction and supervision by a pharmacist may restock an emergency kit or supplemental dose kit to provide for safe and timely patient access.

[2016 c 148 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.